src/fst/phonetics/txt2ipa.xfscript
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ===================================== !
!! Phonological converter for Faroese
!! ==================================

! This file tries out conversion from Faroese orthography to a phonetic
! translation based upon IPA. There is a switch at the end to get 
! SAMPA instaead

! The file is just experimental.

! Usage:
! standing in the catalogue lang-fao:
! ./configure --enable-phonetic
! make -j
! cat text | tr ' ' '\n' | hfst-lookup src/phonetics/txt2ipa.lookup.hfst

!! Table below taken from:
!! > Standardising Pronunciation for a Grapheme-to-Phoneme Converter for Faroese

!! ## FARSAMPA/IPA table

!! | Phoneme class| Orthography  | FARSAMPA | IPA |
!! |:------------ |:------------ |:-------- |:--- |
!! | Stops        | p            | p        | pʰ  |
!! |              | b            | b        | p   |
!! |              | t            | t        | tʰ  |
!! |              | d            | d        | t   |
!! |              | k            | k        | kʰ  |
!! |              | g            | g        | k   |
!! | Fricatives   | f            | f        | f   |
!! |              | v            | v        | v   |
!! |              | ?            | 4        | ð   |
!! |              | ?            | 5        | θ   |
!! |              | s            | s        | s   |
!! |              | s            | S        | ʃ   |
!! |              | ?            | z        | ʂ   |
!! |              | h            | h        | h   |
!! | Affricates   | b            | tS       | tʃʰ |
!! |              | b            | dZ       | tʃ  |
!! | Nasals       | m            | m        | m   |
!! |              | m            | M        | m̥   |
!! |              | n            | n        | n   |
!! |              | n            | x        | n̥   |
!! |              | n            | N        | ŋ   |
!! |              | n            | X        | ŋ̊   |
!! | Laterals     | l            | l        | l   |
!! |              | l            | L        | l̥   |
!! | Approximants | ð            | w        | w   |
!! |              | ð            | j        | j   |
!! |              | r            | r        | ɹ   |
!! | Monophthongs | i            | i        | i   |
!! |              | i?           | I        | ɪ   |
!! |              | e            | e        | e   |
!! |              | e?           | E        | ɛ   |
!! |              | a            | a        | a   |
!! |              | y            | y        | y   |
!! |              | ?            | Y        | ʏ   |
!! |              | ø            | 2        | ø   |
!! |              | ?            | 9        | œ   |
!! |              | ú?           | u        | u   |
!! |              | ?            | U        | ʊ   |
!! |              | ?            | o        | o   |
!! |              | ?            | O        | ɔ   |
!! |              | ?            | 8        | ə   |
!! | Diphthongs   | æ?           | EA       | ɛa  |
!! |              | á            | OA       | ɔa  |
!! |              | oy           | OJ       | ʊi  |
!! |              | ?            | UJ       | ɛi  |
!! |              | ei           | EJ       | ai  |
!! |              | ei?          | aJ       | ai  |
!! |              | ?            | aW       | au  |
!! |              | ?            | OJ       | ɔi  |
!! |              | ?            | OW       | ɔu  |
!! |              | ?            | 3W       | ʉu  |
!! |              | ?            | EW       | ɛu  |
!! |              | ?            | 9W       | œu  |
!! |              | ?            | 9J       | œi  |
!! | Diacritics   | ?            | H        | ʰ   |
!! | Others       | (length)     | :        | ː   |
!! |              | (prim. stress| %        | ˈ   |
!! |              | (sec. stress)| ~        | ˌ   |

echo <<defining Cns and Vow...>>

define Vow       [ a | e | i | o | u | y | æ | ø | å | ö | 
                   A | E | I | O | U | Y | Æ | Ø | Å | Ö | 
                   á | é | ó | ú | í | à | 
                   â | ê | ô | û | î | ã | ý |
                   Á | É | Ó | Ú | Í | À | 
                   Â | Ê | Ô | Û | Î | Ã | Ý |
                   ɪ | ʏ | ɛ | œ | ʊ | ɔ | ʉ | ə ] ;

define Cns [ b | c | d | ð | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | ŋ |
             B | C | D | Ð | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | Ŋ | 
             p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | z |   
             P | Q | R | S | T | V | W | X | Z | 
             ɟ | ʎ | ɲ | ʧ ] ; 

define Sgm [ Vow | Cns ] ;

define Stop [ p | t | k | c | ʧ ] ;

define Alv [ t | T | d | D | ð | Ð | s | S | l | L | r | R | n | N ] ;

define Son [ m | n | ŋ | ɲ | l | r | j | v | ð ] ;

define Nas [ m | M | n | N | ŋ | Ŋ | ɲ ] ;

!define Dummy %^SL ;

define Syll Cns* Vow+ (ː) Cns*  ;
! define Syll Cns* Vow+ Cns* (Dummy) Cns* (ə) %^ ;


echo << Rules>>

define down [ A -> a, Á -> á, B -> b, C -> c, D -> d, Ð -> ð, E -> e, F -> f, 
              G -> g, H -> h, I -> i, J -> j, K -> k, L -> l, M -> m, N -> n, 
              Ŋ -> ŋ, O -> o, P -> p, Q -> q, R -> r, S -> s, T -> t, 
              U -> u, V -> v, W -> w, X -> x, Y -> y, Z -> z, Æ -> æ, 
              Ø -> ø, Å -> å, Ö -> ö ] ;

define odi ð -> j || [Vow|ː] _ [ɪ|i] ;

define egi g -> j || [Vow|ː] _ [ɪ|i] ;

define ng  n -> ŋ || _ g ,,  n -> ŋ̊ || _ k ;

define ShortVow i -> ɪ , y -> ʏ , e -> ɛ , ø -> œ , u -> ʊ , o -> ɔ ;

define LongVow ɪ -> i ː ,
               ʏ -> i ː ,
               ɛ -> e ː ,
               e -> e ː ,
               œ -> ø ː ,
               ɔ -> o ː ,
               o -> o ː ,
               a -> a ː ||
               .#. Cns* _ Cns Vow ;
               

define ShortDiphthong í -> ʊ i , ý -> ʊ i , ə ʏ -> ɛ i , ɔ ʏ -> ɔ i ; 

define LongDiphthong ʊ i -> ʊ i ː , ʊ i -> ʊ i ː , ɛ i -> ɛ i ː , ɔ i -> ɔ i ː ||
               .#. Cns* _ Cns Vow ;

define LongUADiphthong ú -> ʉ u ː , ó -> ɛ u ː , æ -> ɛ a ː , á -> ɔ ɑ ː ;

define ShortUADiphthong ʉ u ː -> ʏ , ɛ u ː -> œ , ɛ a ː -> a , ɔ ɑ ː -> ɔ ||
                .#. Cns* _ Cns Cns [ Cns | .#. ] ;

define FrontPal g -> d z , k -> t ʃ  || .#. _ [ i | e | ɛ ] ;

! Late rules


echo << And now we go for IPA OUTPUTFORMAT >>

define OUTPUTFORMAT a -> ɑ , ä -> æ , ö -> ø , n j -> ɲ , š -> ʃ , ï -> ɨ , %^ -> %. ;

define COLONLENGTH   ɑ ɑ -> ɑ ː , e e -> e ː , i i -> i ː , o o -> o ː , u u -> u ː ,
                     y y -> y ː , ø ø -> ø ː , æ æ -> æ ː , ʉ ʉ -> ʉ ː , ɔ ɔ -> ɔ ː ,
                     b b -> b ː , β β -> β ː , ɸ ɸ -> ɸ ː , ɟ ɟ -> ɟ ː , c c -> c ː , 
                     d d -> d ː , ð ð -> ð ː , f f -> f ː , g g -> g ː , 
                     h h -> h ː , j j -> j ː , k k -> ʰ g , l l -> l ː , ʎ ʎ -> ʎ ː ,
                     m m -> m ː , n n -> n ː , ɲ ɲ -> ɲ ː , p p -> ʰ b ː , r r -> r ː , 
                     s s -> s ː , t t -> ʰ d , ʃ ʃ -> ʃ ː , v v -> v ː ,
                    l̥ l̥  -> l̥ ː , r̥ r̥  -> r̥ ː , m̥ m̥ -> m̥ ː , n̥ n̥ -> n̥ ː , 
                    ŋ̊ ŋ̊ -> ŋ̊ ː , v̥ v̥ -> v̥ ː ,
                     ŋ ŋ -> ŋ ː ;


define dhDeletion ð -> 0 ;
define FinalE ɪ -> ə || _ .#. ;

! Cleaning up
! define DummyDeletion Dummy -> 0 ;


echo <<Combining...>>

read regex [ 
    down 
.o. odi 
.o. egi
.o. ng
.o. ShortVow
.o. LongVow
.o. ShortDiphthong
.o. LongDiphthong
.o. ShortUADiphthong
.o. FrontPal
.o. LongUADiphthong
.o. dhDeletion
.o. FinalE
.o. OUTPUTFORMAT
.o. COLONLENGTH

] ;

echo <<Inverting...>>




!! # For reference: The SAMPA - IPA correspondence

!! | SAMPA   |  IPA  |  Description
!! | ------- | ----- | ------------
!! | p       |  p    |  voiceless bilabial stop
!! | b       |  b    |  voiced bilabial stop
!! | t       |  t    |  voiceless alveolar or dental stop
!! | d       |  d    |  voiced alveolar or dental stop
!! | ts      |  ʦ    |  voiceless alveolar affricate
!! | dz      |  ʣ    |  voiced alveolar affricate
!! | tS      |  ʧ    |  voiceless postalveolar affricate
!! | dZ      |  ʤ    |  voiced postalveolar affricate
!! | c       |  c    |  voiceless palatal stop
!! | J\      |  ɟ    |  (overstroked j)    voiced palatal stop
!! | k       |  k    |  voiceless velar stop
!! | g       |  g    |  voiced velar stop
!! | q       |  q    |  voiceless uvular stop
!! | p\      |  ɸ    |  (Greek phi)    voiceless bilabial fricative
!! | B       |  β    |  (Greek beta)    voiced bilabial fricative
!! |         |  ϐ    |  (Greek beta alt)    voiced bilabial approximant
!! | f       |  f    |  voiceless labiodental fricative
!! | v       |  v    |  voiced labiodental fricative
!! | T       |  θ    |  (Greek theta)    voiceless dental fricative
!! |         |  ϑ    |  (Greek theta alt)    voiceless dental approximant
!! | D       |  ð    |  (Icelandic eth)    voiced dental fricative
!! |         |  δ    |  (Greek delta)    voiced dental approximant
!! | s       |  s    |  voiceless alveolar fricative
!! | z       |  z    |  voiced alveolar fricative
!! | S       |  ʃ    |  voiceless postalveolar fricative
!! | Z       |  ʒ    |  voiced postalveolar fricative
!! | C       |  ç    |  (cedilla)    voiceless palatal fricative
!! | j\ (jj) |  ʝ    |  (j with crossed tail)    voiced palatal fricative
!! | x       |  x    |  voiceless velar fricative
!! | G       |  γ    |  (Greek gamma)    voiced velar fricative
!! |         |  ɰ    |  voiced velar approximant
!! | X\      |  ħ    |  (overstroked h)    voiceless pharyngeal fricative
!! | ?\      |  ʕ    |  (Inverted ?)    voiced pharyngeal fricative
!! | h       |  h    |  voiceless glottal approximant
!! | h\      |  ɦ    |  (h with upper tail to the right)    voiced glottal approximant
!! | m       |  m    |  bilabial nasal
!! | F       |  ɱ    |  (m with downward right tail)    labiodental nasal
!! | n       |  n    |  alveolar or dental nasal
!! | J       |  ɲ    |  (n with downward left tail)    palatal nasal
!! | N       |  ŋ    |  (n with downward right tail)    velar nasal
!! | l       |  l    |  alveolar lateral
!! | L       |  ʎ    |  turned down y, alt. λ (Greek lambda)    palatal lateral
!! | 5       |  ɫ    |  (l with middle tilde)    velarized dental lateral
!! | 4 (r)   |  ɾ    |  (r without upper-left serif)    alveolar flap
!! | r (rr)  |  r    |  alveolar trill
!! | r\      |  ɹ    |  (r rotated 180°)    retroflexed alveolar approximant
!! | R       |  ʀ    |  (small capital R)    uvular trill
!! | P       |  ʋ    |  labiodental approximant
!! | w       |  w    |  velo-labial approximant
!! | H       |  ɥ    |  (turned down h)    palato-labial approximant
!! | j       |  j    |  palatal approximant

!! ## Vowels
!! ```
!! .             front   near-front    central   near-back   back
!! close          i • y               1 • }                 M • u
!! near-close              I • Y                    U
!! close-mid      e • 2              @\ • 8                 7 • o
!! mid                                  @            
!! open-mid       E • 9               3 • 3\                V • O
!! near-open        {                    6           
!! open           a • &                                     A • Q
!! ```


!! ## More SAMPA/IPA documentation

!! (Some symbols are doubled or escaped with \ in the source to escape Markdown (mis)interpretation, they will appear correct in the rendered HTML.)
